Utah statutes.
53B-8-110.   Regents' Scholarship Program -- Supplemental award to encourage college savings.

(1)  A student who qualifies for the Base Regents' Scholarship in accordance with the provisions of Section 53B-8-109 may be awarded up to an additional $400 as provided in this section.

(2)  A student who qualifies for the Base Regents' Scholarship shall be awarded $100 for a year that:

(a)  the student was 14, 15, 16, or 17 years of age; and

(b)  at least $100 in contributions, excluding transfers, investment earnings, and interest, was deposited in a Utah Educational Savings Plan account that designated the student as the beneficiary.

